Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-524
Convictions; suspension of license or registration of operator or owner; when; reinstatement; proof of financial responsibility.

(1) Whenever the department, under any law of this state, suspends or revokes the license of any person upon receiving record of a conviction, the department shall also suspend all registrations in the name of such person, except that it shall not suspend such registrations, unless otherwise required by law, if such person has previously given or shall immediately give and shall maintain for three years proof of financial responsibility.

(2) Whenever the department, under any law of this state, suspends or revokes the license of any person upon receiving record of a conviction, and such person was not the owner of the motor vehicle used at the time of the violation resulting in the conviction, the department shall also suspend the license and all registrations in the name of the owner of the motor vehicle so used, if such vehicle was operated with such owner's permission or consent at the time of the violation, unless such owner has previously given or shall immediately give and maintain for three years proof of financial responsibility. This subsection shall not apply to such owner if he or she had in effect at the time of the violation an automobile liability policy or bond with respect to such motor vehicle; or if there was then in effect an automobile liability policy or bond with respect to the operation of the motor vehicle; or if the liability of such operator or owner was then, in the judgment of the department, covered by any other form of liability insurance policy or bond; or if the owner or operator was then qualified as a self-insurer under sections 60-562 to 60-564.

(3) Whenever the department, pursuant to any law of this state, suspends or revokes the license of any person after having received a record of conviction of the licensee, such person shall not be eligible for reinstatement of his or her driving privilege until he or she shall give and thereafter maintain proof of financial responsibility.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 24, p. 493;

Laws 1959, c. 298, § 13, p. 1117;

Laws 1975, LB 264, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 704, § 43.